Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1768
Duties of directors.

In addition to the duties found elsewhere in the Credit Union Act, the board of directors shall:

(1) Act upon applications for membership or appoint one or more membership officers to act on applications for membership under such conditions as prescribed by the board. A person denied membership by a membership officer may appeal the denial in writing to the board;

(2) Purchase adequate bond coverage as required by section 21-1767.01;

(3) Report to the department all bond claims within thirty calendar days after filing and all frauds and embezzlements involving officials or employees within thirty calendar days after discovery;

(4) Determine from time to time the interest rate or rates, consistent with the Credit Union Act, to be charged on loans, or under such conditions as prescribed by the board, delegate the authority to make such determinations and to authorize any interest refunds on such classes of loans and under such conditions as the board prescribes;

(5) Establish the policies of the credit union with respect to (a) shares, share drafts, and share certificates and (b) the granting of loans and the extending of lines of credit, including, subject to the limitations contained in section 21-1791, the maximum amount which may be loaned to any one member;

(6) Declare dividends on shares or delegate the authority to declare dividends under such conditions as prescribed by the board;

(7) Have charge of investment of funds, except that the board may appoint an investment committee of not less than three directors or an investment officer who is either a member of the board of directors or an employee of the credit union to make investments under conditions and policies established by the board and to make monthly reports to the board;

(8) Establish written policies for investments, including deposits and loans other than those to individuals, which address, at a minimum, investment objectives, investment responsibility, portfolio composition, diversification, and the financial condition of the investment obligor;

(9) Authorize the employment of such persons necessary to carry on the business of the credit union and fix the compensation, if any, of the chief executive officer;

(10) Approve an annual operating budget for the credit union which includes provisions for the compensation of employees;

(11) Designate a depository or depositories for the funds of the credit union;

(12) Suspend or remove any or all members of the credit committee, if any, for failure to perform their duties;

(13) Appoint any special committee deemed necessary;

(14) Adopt and enforce the overall policies for the operation of the credit union; and

(15) Perform such other duties as directed by the members of the credit union from time to time and perform or authorize any action not inconsistent with the Credit Union Act and not specifically reserved by the bylaws for the members of the credit union.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 68;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 26.